Maine, session 132, LD1406.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §4002, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2021, c. 176, §1, is further
amended to read:
1. Abuse or neglect. "Abuse or neglect" means a threat to a child's health or welfare
by physical, mental or emotional injury or impairment, or sexual abuse or exploitation
including under Title 17‑A, sections 282, 852, 853 and 855 or deprivation of essential
needs, or lack of protection from these, by a person responsible for the child. "Abuse or
neglect" also means serious harm or threat of serious harm by a person responsible for the
child due to inadequate care or supervision of the child or deprivation of food, clothing,
shelter, education or medical care necessary for the child's health or welfare by that person
when that person is financially able to provide food, clothing, shelter, education or medical
care necessary for the child's health or welfare or is offered lawful and reasonable financial
means or resources to do so. "Abuse or neglect" also means truancy under Title 20‑A,
section 3272, subsection 2, paragraph C or section 5051‑A, subsection 1, paragraph C or D
when truancy is the result of neglect by a person responsible for the child. "Abuse or
neglect" also means a threat to a child's health or welfare caused by child sex trafficking
by any person, regardless of whether or not the person is responsible for the child.
Page 1 - 132LR1322(03)

Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR1322(03)